Utah statutes.
57-12-13.   Procedure for acquisition of property.
Any agency acquiring real property as to which it has the power to acquire
under the eminent domain or condemnation laws of this state shall comply with
the following policies:
(1)  Every reasonable effort shall be made to acquire expeditiously real
property by negotiation.
(2)  Real property shall be appraised before the initiation of negotiations,
and the owner or his designated representative shall be given an opportunity
to accompany the appraiser during his inspection of the property.
(3)  Before the initiation of negotiations for real property, an amount shall
be established which is reasonably believed to be just compensation therefor,
and such amount shall be offered for the property. In no event shall such
amount be less than the lowest approved appraisal of the fair market value of
the property. Any decrease or increase of the fair market value of real
property prior to the date of valuation caused by the public improvement for
which such property is acquired or by the likelihood that the property would
be acquired for such improvement, other than that due to physical
deterioration within the reasonable control of the owner, will be disregarded
in determining the compensation for the property. The owner of the real
property to be acquired shall be provided with a written statement of, and
summary of the basis for, the amount established as just compensation. Where
appropriate the just compensation for real property acquired and for damages
to remaining real property shall be separately stated.
(4)  No owner shall be required to surrender possession of real property
acquired through federal or federally assisted programs before the agreed
purchase price is paid or there is deposited with a court having jurisdiction
of condemnation of such property, in accordance with applicable law, for the
benefit of the owner an amount not less than the lowest approved appraisal of
the fair market value of such property or the amount of the award of
compensation in the condemnation proceeding of such property.
(5)  The construction or development of a public improvement shall be so
scheduled that, to the greatest extent practicable, no person lawfully
occupying real property shall be required to move from a dwelling (assuming a
replacement dwelling will be available) or to move his business or farm
operation without at least 90 days' written notice from the date by which such
move is required.
(6)  If an owner or tenant is permitted to occupy the real property acquired
on a rental basis for a short term or for a period subject to termination on
short notice, the amount of rent required shall not exceed the fair rental
value of the property to a short-term occupier.
(7)  In no event shall the time of condemnation be advanced, on negotiations
or condemnation and the deposit of funds in court for the use of the owner be
deferred, or any other coercive action be taken to compel an agreement on the
price to be paid for the property.
(8)  If an interest in real property is to be acquired by exercise of the
power of eminent domain, formal condemnation proceedings shall be instituted.
The acquiring agency shall not intentionally make it necessary for an owner to
institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the taking of his real
property.
(9)  If the acquisition of only part of the property would leave its owner
with an uneconomic remnant, an offer to acquire the entire property shall be
made.
